Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1100YH (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 186 Section 1. Section 232.68, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âNonpublic schoolâ means the same as 3 defined in section 280.2. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. âPublic schoolâ means the same as 5 defined in section 280.2. 6 Sec. 2. Section 232.68, subsection 8, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. An employee or agent of any public school 9 or nonpublic school. 10 Sec. 3. Section 232.71B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 21. Board of educational examiners ââ 13 notice. The department shall report the results of a child 14 abuse assessment to the board of educational examiners created 15 in section 256.146 if all of the following circumstances apply: 16 a. The alleged perpetrator is an employee or agent of any 17 public school or nonpublic school. 18 b. The alleged perpetrator holds a license, certificate, 19 authorization, or statement of recognition issued by the board 20 of educational examiners. 21 c. The department issues a finding that the alleged child 22 abuse meets the definition of child abuse. 23 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 232.71E School procedures ââ 24 rulemaking authority. 25 1. The department of health and human services, in 26 consultation with the department of education, shall adopt 27 rules pursuant to chapter 17A prescribing procedures each board 28 of directors of a school district and each authority in charge 29 of a nonpublic school shall adopt, pursuant to section 280.17, 30 for the handling of reports of child abuse alleged to have 31 been committed by an employee or agent of a public school or 32 nonpublic school. 33 2. Rules adopted under this section shall include but not be 34 limited to all of the following: 35 -1- LSB 1100YH (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 186 a. A public school or nonpublic school shall report child 1 abuse alleged to have been committed by an employee or agent of 2 a public school or nonpublic school to the department of health 3 and human services. 4 b. If child abuse alleged to have been committed by an 5 employee or agent of a public school or a nonpublic school 6 would, if true, constitute a criminal act harming a child, the 7 public school or nonpublic school shall also report the alleged 8 child abuse to law enforcement. 9 Sec. 5. Section 280.17, Code 2025, is amended by striking 10 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 11 280.17 Procedures for handling child abuse reports. 12 1. For purposes of this section: 13 a. âChild abuseâ means the same as defined in section 14 232.68. 15 b. âChild abuse assessmentâ means a child abuse assessment 16 under section 232.71B. 17 2. a. The board of directors of a school district and the 18 authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall prescribe 19 procedures in accordance with rules adopted by the department 20 of health and human services under section 232.71E for handling 21 reports of child abuse alleged to have been committed by an 22 employee or agent of the public school or nonpublic school. 23 b. The board of directors of a school district and the 24 authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall exercise 25 due diligence in assisting the department of health and human 26 services, as requested by the department of health and human 27 services, with a child abuse assessment related to child abuse 28 alleged to have been committed by an employee or agent of the 29 public school or nonpublic school. 30 3. The board of directors of a school district and the 31 authorities in charge of a nonpublic school shall place 32 on administrative leave an employee or agent of the public 33 school or nonpublic school who is the subject of an ongoing 34 child abuse assessment. The employee or agent shall also be 35 -2- LSB 1100YH (1) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 186 prohibited from entering school property while subject to an 1 ongoing child abuse assessment. 2